Hawaii, session 2026, HB1498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1. The purpose of this Act is to enhance Hawaii's status as a premier destination for film, television, and digital media production by modernizing the State's film and media production tax credits.  This Act boosts the current incentives with an additional five per cent in credits for productions that meet the minimum filming requirements at a qualified production facility of the scale identified in the city and county of Honolulu's Ordinance 25-1. This Act encourages workforce development in film and media production, particularly on Oahu's west side and on the neighbor islands, by fostering local talent pipelines, supporting educational partnerships, and incentivizing the hiring of Hawaii residents in production roles. Finally, this Act also recognizes the critical role of privately financed investments in film production infrastructure, such as the planned development of a state‑of‑the-art production facility on University of Hawaii lands at West Oahu, in strengthening Hawaii's capacity to support high-quality productions.  The adoption of Ordinance 25‑1 by the city and county of Honolulu to incentivize film studio development underscores the alignment of state and local efforts to build a robust and sustainable media industry.  By enhancing Hawaii's film, television, and digital media tax credits in partnership with the city and county of Honolulu, this Act will create a favorable economic climate for private investment, ensure long‑term industry growth, and expand opportunities for local workers and communities across the islands. PART II SECTION 2.  Section 235-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By amending subsection (a) to read: "(a) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, there shall be allowed to each taxpayer subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter, an income tax credit that shall be deductible from the taxpayer's net income tax liability, if any, imposed by this chapter for the taxable year in which the credit is properly claimed.  The amount of the credit shall be[:] equal to the sum of the following: (1)  Either: (A)  Twenty-two per cent of the qualified production costs incurred by a qualified production in any county of the State with a population of over seven hundred thousand; or [(2)] (B)  Twenty-seven per cent of the qualified production costs incurred by a qualified production in any county of the State with a population of seven hundred thousand or less[.]; and (2)  An additional five per cent of the qualified production costs incurred by a qualified production that utilizes qualified production facilities located within the State. A qualified production occurring in more than one county may prorate its expenditures based upon the amounts spent in each county, if the population bases differ enough to change the percentage of tax credit. In the case of a partnership, S corporation, estate, or trust, the tax credit allowable is for qualified production costs incurred by the entity for the taxable year.  The cost upon which the tax credit is computed shall be determined at the entity level.  Distribution and share of credit shall be determined by rule. If a deduction is taken under section 179 (with respect to election to expense depreciable business assets) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, no tax credit shall be allowed for those costs for which the deduction is taken. The basis for eligible property for depreciation of accelerated cost recovery system purposes for state income taxes shall be reduced by the amount of credit allowable and claimed." 2.  By amending subsection (l) to read: "(l)  Total tax credits claimed per qualified production shall not exceed [$17,000,000.] $          ." 3.  By amending subsections (n) and (o) to read: "(n)  The total amount of tax credits allowed under this section in any particular year shall be [$50,000,000;] $          ; however, if the total amount of credits applied for in any particular year exceeds the aggregate amount of credits allowed for that year under this section, the excess shall be treated as having been applied for in the subsequent year and shall be claimed in the subsequent year; provided that no excess shall be allowed to be claimed after December 31, 2032. (o)  For the purposes of this section: "Commercial": (1)  Means an advertising message that is filmed using film, videotape, or digital media, for dissemination via television broadcast or theatrical distribution; (2)  Includes a series of advertising messages if all parts are produced at the same time over the course of six consecutive weeks; and (3)  Does not include an advertising message with Internet‑only distribution. "Digital media" means production methods and platforms directly related to the creation of cinematic imagery and content, specifically using digital means, including but not limited to digital cameras, digital sound equipment, and computers, to be delivered via film, videotape, interactive game platform, or other digital distribution media. "Post-production" means production activities and services conducted after principal photography is completed, including but not limited to editing, film and video transfers, duplication, transcoding, dubbing, subtitling, credits, closed captioning, audio production, special effects (visual and sound), graphics, and animation. "Production" means a series of activities that are directly related to the creation of visual and cinematic imagery to be delivered via film, videotape, or digital media and to be sold, distributed, or displayed as entertainment or the advertisement of products for mass public consumption, including but not limited to scripting, casting, set design and construction, transportation, videography, photography, sound recording, interactive game design, and post-production. "Production facility" means a building or complex of buildings and associated backlot facilities on real property situated within the State in which pre-production, production, and post-production activities occur that contain: (1)  At least one sound stage; (2)  Pre-production, production, and post-production offices; (3)  Catering or dining facilities; (4)  Parking; (5)  Facades; and (6)  Mill space, and that is closed to the general public and is within a footprint of the site plan that forms a secure compound that is clearly delineated with a tall perimeter enclosure.  The term excludes buildings and facilities that are not used for pre‑production, production, and post-production activities, but are constructed or used in connection with the production facility, including hotel and lodging facilities, or portions thereof. "Qualified production": (1)  Means a production, with expenditures in the State, for the total or partial production of a feature‑length motion picture, short film, made‑for‑television movie, commercial, music video, interactive game, television series pilot, single season (up to twenty-two episodes) of a television series regularly filmed in the State (if the number of episodes per single season exceeds twenty-two, additional episodes for the same season shall constitute a separate qualified production), television special, single television episode that is not part of a television series regularly filmed or based in the State, national magazine show, or national talk show.  For the purposes of subsections (d) and (l), each of the aforementioned qualified production categories shall constitute separate, individual qualified productions; and (2)  Does not include: (A)  News; (B)  Public affairs programs; (C)  Non-national magazine or talk shows; (D)  Televised sporting events or activities; (E)  Productions that solicit funds; (F)  Productions produced primarily for industrial, corporate, institutional, or other private purposes; and (G)  Productions that include any material or performance prohibited by chapter 712. "Qualified production costs" means the costs incurred by a qualified production within the State that are subject to the general excise tax under chapter 237 [at the highest rate of tax] or income tax under this chapter [if the costs are not subject to general excise tax] and that have not been financed by any investments for which a credit was or will be claimed pursuant to section 235-110.9.  Qualified production costs include but are not limited to: (1)  Costs incurred during preproduction such as location scouting and related services; (2)  Costs of set construction and operations, purchases or rentals of wardrobe, props, accessories, food, office supplies, transportation, equipment, and related services; (3)  Wages or salaries of cast, crew, and musicians; (4)  Costs of photography, sound synchronization, lighting, and related services; (5)  Costs of editing, visual effects, music, other post‑production, and related services; (6)  Rentals and fees for use of local facilities and locations, including rentals and fees for use of state and county facilities and locations that are not subject to general excise tax under chapter 237 or income tax under this chapter; (7)  Rentals of vehicles and lodging for cast and crew; (8)  Airfare for flights to or from Hawaii, and interisland flights; (9)  Insurance and bonding; (10)  Shipping of equipment and supplies to or from Hawaii, and interisland shipments; and (11)  Other direct production costs specified by the department in consultation with the department of business, economic development, and tourism; provided that any government-imposed fines, penalties, or interest that are incurred by a qualified production within the State shall not be "qualified production costs".  "Qualified production costs" does not include any costs funded by any grant, forgivable loan, or other amounts not included in gross income for purposes of this chapter. "Qualified production facility" means a production facility engaged in the production of a qualified production; provided that the production facility: (1)  Is located within the State; (2)  Is constructed after December 31, 2024; (3)  Is located on real property that: (A)  Is a minimum of ten acres in size; and (B)  Has been leased or purchased from the United States, the State, or any political subdivision thereof; and (4)  Costs a minimum of $100,000,000 to design and construct." PART III SECTION 3. The legislature finds that in 2019, the department of taxation stopped considering production as a form of manufacturing.  As a result, the general excise tax rate applied to many elements of production increased substantially, from 0.5 to four per cent, increasing the costs for motion picture, digital media, and television production.  The legislature further finds that restoring the general excise tax treatment of production as manufacturing would help expand the motion picture, digital media, and television industry in Hawaii, creating jobs and stimulating the economy. The legislature also finds that during the 1980s and 1990s, the legislature recognized the unfairness of having the general excise tax apply to payroll reimbursements and enacted exemptions specific to several discrete industries. Act 175, Session Laws of Hawaii 1988, now codified as section 237-23.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, provides that the general excise tax does not apply to common paymasters that are reimbursed by related corporations that actually employ the workers paid.  Act 351, Session Laws of Hawaii 1989, now codified as section 237-24.7(1), Hawaii Revised Statutes, provides that the general excise tax does not apply to amounts received for employee wages, salaries, payroll taxes, insurance premiums, and benefits, including retirement, vacation, sick pay, and health benefits, by a hotel operator.  Act 252, Session Laws of Hawaii 1992, now codified as section 237-24.7(4), Hawaii Revised Statutes, provides that the general excise tax does not apply to similar amounts received by an orchard operator.  Act 214, Session Laws of Hawaii 1998, now codified as section 237-24.7(8), Hawaii Revised Statutes, provides that the general excise tax does not apply to similar amounts received by a management company from related entities selling telecommunications services. In the preamble to Act 214, Session Laws of Hawaii 1998, the legislature discussed the exemptions for hotel and orchard operators and then stated, "It is important that the same exemption be extended to telecommunications businesses, because of the highly mobile nature of telecommunications jobs.  Also, the general excise tax was never intended to serve, in effect, as a tax on payrolls." The legislature notes that, in Tax Information Release No. 2024-04, the department of taxation has stated that the general excise tax applies to all amounts that a payroll service company receives from a film production company, unless there is a specific statutory exemption for those amounts. Accordingly, the purpose of this part is to: (1)  Include production as a form of manufacturing for the purposes of the general excise tax rate; and (2)  Exempt from the general excise tax amounts received by a motion picture project employer from a client equal to amounts that are disbursed by the motion picture project employer for employee wages, salaries, payroll taxes, insurance premiums, and employment benefits and payments to loan-out companies. SECTION 4.  Section 237-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§237-13 Imposition of tax.  There is hereby levied and shall be assessed and collected annually privilege taxes against persons on account of their business and other activities in the State measured by the application of rates against values of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income, whichever is specified, as follows: (1)  Tax on manufacturers. (A)  Upon every person engaging or continuing within the State in the business of manufacturing, including compounding, canning, preserving, packing, printing, publishing, production as defined in section 235-17, milling, processing, refining, or preparing for sale, profit, or commercial use, either directly or through the activity of others, in whole or in part, any article or articles, substance or substances, commodity or commodities, the amount of the tax to be equal to the value of the articles, substances, or commodities, manufactured, compounded, canned, preserved, packed, printed, milled, processed, refined, or prepared for sale, as shown by the gross proceeds derived from the sale thereof by the manufacturer or person compounding, preparing, or printing them, multiplied by one-half of one per cent. (B)  The measure of the tax on manufacturers is the value of the entire product for sale. (2)  Tax on business of selling tangible personal property; producing. (A)  Upon every person engaging or continuing in the business of selling any tangible personal property whatsoever, there is likewise hereby levied, and shall be assessed and collected, a tax equivalent to four per cent of the gross proceeds of sales of the business; provided that, in the case of a wholesaler, the tax shall be equal to one-half of one per cent of the gross proceeds of sales of the business; and provided further that insofar as the sale of tangible personal property is a wholesale sale under section 237-4(a)(8), the tax shall be one-half of one per cent of the gross proceeds.  Upon every person engaging or continuing within this State in the business of a producer, the tax shall be equal to one-half of one per cent of the gross proceeds of sales of the business, or the value of the products, for sale. (B)  Gross proceeds of sales of tangible property in interstate and foreign commerce shall constitute a part of the measure of the tax imposed on persons in the business of selling tangible personal property, to the extent, under the conditions, and in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution of the United States and the Acts of the Congress of the United States which may be now in force or may be hereafter adopted, and whenever there occurs in the State an activity to which, under the Constitution and Acts of Congress, there may be attributed gross proceeds of sales, the gross proceeds shall be so attributed. (C)  No manufacturer or producer, engaged in such business in the State and selling the manufacturer's or producer's products for delivery outside of the State (for example, consigned to a mainland purchaser via common carrier f.o.b. Honolulu), shall be required to pay the tax imposed in this chapter for the privilege of so selling the products, and the value or gross proceeds of sales of the products shall be included only in determining the measure of the tax imposed upon the manufacturer or producer. (D)  A manufacturer or producer, engaged in such business in the State, shall pay the tax imposed in this chapter for the privilege of selling its products in the State, and the value or gross proceeds of sales of the products, thus subjected to tax, may be deducted insofar as duplicated as to the same products by the measure of the tax upon the manufacturer or producer for the privilege of manufacturing or producing in the State; provided that no producer of agricultural products who sells the products to a purchaser who will process the products outside the State shall be required to pay the tax imposed in this chapter for the privilege of producing or selling those products. (E)  A taxpayer selling to a federal cost-plus contractor may make the election provided for by paragraph (3)(C), and in that case the tax shall be computed pursuant to the election, notwithstanding this paragraph or paragraph (1) to the contrary. (F)  The department, by rule, may require that a seller take from the purchaser of tangible personal property a certificate, in a form prescribed by the department, certifying that the sale is a sale at wholesale; provided that: (i)  Any purchaser who furnishes a certificate shall be obligated to pay to the seller, upon demand, the amount of the additional tax that is imposed upon the seller whenever the sale in fact is not at wholesale; and (ii)  The absence of a certificate in itself shall give rise to the presumption that the sale is not at wholesale unless the sales of the business are exclusively at wholesale. (3)  Tax upon contractors. (A)  Upon every person engaging or continuing within the State in the business of contracting, the tax shall be equal to four per cent of the gross income of the business. (B)  In computing the tax levied under this paragraph, there shall be deducted from the gross income of the taxpayer so much thereof as has been included in the measure of the tax levied under subparagraph (A), on another taxpayer who is a contractor, as defined in section 237-6; provided that any person claiming a deduction under this paragraph shall be required to show in the person's return the name and general excise number of the person paying the tax on the amount deducted by the person. (C)  In computing the tax levied under this paragraph against any federal cost-plus contractor, there shall be excluded from the gross income of the contractor so much thereof as fulfills the following requirements: (i)  The gross income exempted shall constitute reimbursement of costs incurred for materials, plant, or equipment purchased from a taxpayer licensed under this chapter, not exceeding the gross proceeds of sale of the taxpayer on account of the transaction; and (ii)  The taxpayer making the sale shall have certified to the department that the taxpayer is taxable with respect to the gross proceeds of the sale, and that the taxpayer elects to have the tax on gross income computed the same as upon a sale to the state government. (D)  A person who, as a business or as a part of a business in which the person is engaged, erects, constructs, or improves any building or structure, of any kind or description, or makes, constructs, or improves any road, street, sidewalk, sewer, or water system, or other improvements on land held by the person (whether held as a leasehold, fee simple, or otherwise), upon the sale or other disposition of the land or improvements, even if the work was not done pursuant to a contract, shall be liable to the same tax as if engaged in the business of contracting, unless the person shows that at the time the person was engaged in making the improvements the person intended, and for the period of at least one year after completion of the building, structure, or other improvements the person continued to intend to hold and not sell or otherwise dispose of the land or improvements.  The tax in respect of the improvements shall be measured by the amount of the proceeds of the sale or other disposition that is attributable to the erection, construction, or improvement of such building or structure, or the making, constructing, or improving of the road, street, sidewalk, sewer, or water system, or other improvements.  The measure of tax in respect of the improvements shall not exceed the amount which would have been taxable had the work been performed by another, subject as in other cases to the deductions allowed by subparagraph (B).  Upon the election of the taxpayer, this paragraph may be applied notwithstanding that the improvements were not made by the taxpayer, or were not made as a business or as a part of a business, or were made with the intention of holding the same.  However, this paragraph shall not apply in respect of any proceeds that constitute or are in the nature of rent, which shall be taxable under paragraph (9); provided that insofar as the business of renting or leasing real property under a lease is taxed under section 237-16.5, the tax shall be levied by section 237-16.5. (4)  Tax upon theaters, amusements, radio broadcasting stations, etc. (A)  Upon every person engaging or continuing within the State in the business of operating a theater, opera house, moving picture show, vaudeville, amusement park, dance hall, skating rink, radio broadcasting station, or any other place at which amusements are offered to the public, the tax shall be equal to four per cent of the gross income of the business, and in the case of a sale of an amusement at wholesale under section 237-4(a)(13), the tax shall be one-half of one per cent of the gross income. (B)  The department may require that the person rendering an amusement at wholesale take from the licensed seller a certificate, in a form prescribed by the department, certifying that the sale is a sale at wholesale; provided that: (i)  Any licensed seller who furnishes a certificate shall be obligated to pay to the person rendering the amusement, upon demand, the amount of additional tax that is imposed upon the seller whenever the sale is not at wholesale; and (ii)  The absence of a certificate in itself shall give rise to the presumption that the sale is not at wholesale unless the person rendering the sale is exclusively rendering the amusement at wholesale. (5)  Tax upon sales representatives, etc.  Upon every person classified as a representative or purchasing agent under section 237-1, engaging or continuing within the State in the business of performing services for another, other than as an employee, there is likewise hereby levied and shall be assessed and collected a tax equal to four per cent of the commissions and other compensation attributable to the services so rendered by the person. (6)  Tax on service business. (A)  Upon every person engaging or continuing within the State in any service business or calling including professional services not otherwise specifically taxed under this chapter, there is likewise hereby levied and shall be assessed and collected a tax equal to four per cent of the gross income of the business, and in the case of a wholesaler under section 237-4(a)(10), the tax shall be equal to one-half of one per cent of the gross income of the business. (B)  The department may require that the person rendering a service at wholesale take from the licensed seller a certificate, in a form prescribed by the department, certifying that the sale is a sale at wholesale; provided that: (i)  Any licensed seller who furnishes a certificate shall be obligated to pay to the person rendering the service, upon demand, the amount of additional tax that is imposed upon the seller whenever the sale is not at wholesale; and (ii)  The absence of a certificate in itself shall give rise to the presumption that the sale is not at wholesale unless the person rendering the sale is exclusively rendering services at wholesale. (C)  Where any person is engaged in the business of selling interstate or foreign common carrier telecommunication services within and without the State, other than as a home service provider, the tax shall be imposed on that portion of gross income received by a person from service which is originated or terminated in this State and is charged to a telephone number, customer, or account in this State notwithstanding any other state law (except for the exemption under section 237-23(a)(1)) to the contrary.  If, under the Constitution and laws of the United States, the entire gross income as determined under this paragraph of a business selling interstate or foreign common carrier telecommunication services cannot be included in the measure of the tax, the gross income shall be apportioned as provided in section 237-21; provided that the apportionment factor and formula shall be the same for all persons providing those services in the State. (D)  Where any person is engaged in the business of a home service provider, the tax shall be imposed on the gross income received or derived from providing interstate or foreign mobile telecommunications services to a customer with a place of primary use in this State when the services originate in one state and terminate in another state, territory, or foreign country; provided that all charges for mobile telecommunications services which are billed by or for the home service provider are deemed to be provided by the home service provider at the customer's place of primary use, regardless of where the mobile telecommunications originate, terminate, or pass through; provided further that the income from charges specifically derived from interstate or foreign mobile telecommunications services, as determined by books and records that are kept in the regular course of business by the home service provider in accordance with section 239-24, shall be apportioned under any apportionment factor or formula adopted under subparagraph (C). Gross income shall not include: (i)  Gross receipts from mobile telecommunications services provided to a customer with a place of primary use outside this State; (ii)  Gross receipts from mobile telecommunications services that are subject to the tax imposed by chapter 239; (iii)  Gross receipts from mobile telecommunications services taxed under section 237-13.8; and (iv)  Gross receipts of a home service provider acting as a serving carrier providing mobile telecommunications services to another home service provider's customer. For the purposes of this paragraph, "charges for mobile telecommunications services", "customer", "home service provider", "mobile telecommunications services", "place of primary use", and "serving carrier" have the same meaning as in section 239-22. (7)  Tax on insurance producers.  Upon every person engaged as a licensed producer pursuant to chapter 431, there is hereby levied and shall be assessed and collected a tax equal to 0.15 per cent of the commissions due to that activity. (8)  Tax on receipts of sugar benefit payments. Upon the amounts received from the United States government by any producer of sugar (or the producer's legal representative or heirs), as defined under and by virtue of the Sugar Act of 1948, as amended, or other Acts of the Congress of the United States relating thereto, there is hereby levied a tax of one-half of one per cent of the gross amount received; provided that the tax levied hereunder on any amount so received and actually disbursed to another by a producer in the form of a benefit payment shall be paid by the person or persons to whom the amount is actually disbursed, and the producer actually making a benefit payment to another shall be entitled to claim on the producer's return a deduction from the gross amount taxable hereunder in the sum of the amount so disbursed.  The amounts taxed under this paragraph shall not be taxable under any other paragraph, subsection, or section of this chapter. (9)  Tax on other business.  Upon every person engaging or continuing within the State in any business, trade, activity, occupation, or calling not included in the preceding paragraphs or any other provisions of this chapter, there is likewise hereby levied and shall be assessed and collected, a tax equal to four per cent of the gross income thereof.  In addition, the rate prescribed by this paragraph shall apply to a business taxable under one or more of the preceding paragraphs or other provisions of this chapter, as to any gross income thereof not taxed thereunder as gross income or gross proceeds of sales or by taxing an equivalent value of products, unless specifically exempted." SECTION 5.  Section 237-24.75, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§237-24.75  Additional exemptions.  In addition to the amounts exempt under section 237-24, this chapter shall not apply to: (1)  Amounts received as a beverage container deposit collected under chapter 342G, part VIII; (2)  Amounts received by the operator of the Hawaii convention center for reimbursement of costs or advances made pursuant to a contract with the Hawaii tourism authority under section 201B‑7; [and] (3)  Amounts received by a professional employer organization that is registered with the department of labor and industrial relations pursuant to chapter 373L, from a client company equal to amounts that are disbursed by the professional employer organization for employee wages, salaries, payroll taxes, insurance premiums, and benefits, including retirement, vacation, sick leave, health benefits, and similar employment benefits with respect to covered employees at a client company; provided that this exemption shall not apply to amounts received by a professional employer organization after: (A)  Notification from the department of labor and industrial relations that the professional employer organization has not fulfilled or maintained the registration requirements under this chapter; or (B)  A determination by the department that the professional employer organization has failed to pay any tax withholding for covered employees or any federal or state taxes for which the professional employer organization is responsible. As used in this paragraph, "professional employer organization", "client company", and "covered employee" shall have the meanings provided in section 373L-1[.]; and (4)  Amounts received by a motion picture project employer from a client equal to amounts that are disbursed by the motion picture project employer for employee wages, salaries, payroll taxes, insurance premiums, and benefits, including retirement, vacation, sick leave, health benefits, and similar employment benefits with respect to motion picture project workers at a client and for payments to loan-out companies. As used in this paragraph, "motion picture project employer" and "motion picture project worker" have the same meanings as in section 3512 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended." PART IV SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that: (1)  Section 2 shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024; and (2)  Section 5 shall take effect on January 1, 2026.